California, session 20252026, AB2576.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65912.161 of the Government Code is amended to read:65912.161. (a) For purposes of this section, “transit-oriented development alternative plan” shall mean a plan adopted by the local agency via the adoption of the housing element, a program to implement the housing element, the adoption of a specific plan, a zoning overlay, or enactment of an ordinance; that brings the local agency into compliance with this chapter and that incorporates all of the following:(1) A local transit-oriented development alternative plan shall maintain at least the same total net zoned capacity, in terms of both total units and residential floor area, as provided for in this chapter across all transit-oriented development zones within the jurisdiction.(A) Net zoned capacity in units shall be measured by subtracting the current number of units on the site from the number allowed by the applicable development standards.(B) Net zoned capacity in floor area shall be measured by subtracting the current developed floor area of the site from the amount allowed by the applicable development standards.(2) The plan shall not reduce the maximum allowed density for any individual site on which the plan allows residential use by more than 50 percent below that permitted under this chapter, except for sites meeting any of the following criteria:(A) Sites within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178, or within the state responsibility area, as defined in Section 4102 of the Public Resources Code.(B) Sites that are vulnerable to one foot of sea level rise, as determined by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the Ocean Protection Council, the United States Geological Survey, the University of California, or a local government’s coastal hazards vulnerability assessment.(C) Sites with a historic resource designated on a local register, so long as sites excluded from the density requirements of this paragraph on that basis do not cumulatively exceed 10 percent of the eligible area of any transit-oriented development zone.(D) Sites within one-half mile of a Tier 2 transit-oriented development stop shall not have a density below 30 units per acre with a residential floor area ratio of 1.0, except for sites specified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, and should be considered for attached entry level owner-occupied housing development opportunities.(3) The plan shall not reduce the capacity in any transit-oriented development zone in total units or residential floor area by more than 50 percent.(4) A site’s maximum capacity counted toward the plan shall not exceed 200 percent of the maximum density established under this chapter. Any site excluded from the minimum density requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (2) shall not be counted toward the plan’s capacity. For purposes of this section, calculations regarding capacity, density, and floor area shall include capacity, density, or floor area available under voluntary local housing incentive programs.(5)  A local transit-oriented development alternative plan may consist of an existing local transit-oriented zoning ordinance, overlay zone, specific plan, or zoning incentive ordinance, provided that it meets the requirements of this subdivision.(b) (1) Prior to one year following the adoption of the seventh revision of the housing element, Section 65912.157 shall not apply to any of the following for which the local government has adopted an ordinance in accordance with Section 65912.160 indicating the site’s exclusion:(A)Any of the following designated before January 1, 2025:(i)Sites with a historic resource on a local register.(ii)A contributing site within a historic district included on the State Historic Resources Inventory, as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code.(iii)A parcel individually listed as a historical resource included in the State Historic Resources Inventory, as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code.(B)Prior to one year following the adoption of the seventh revision of the housing element, any of the following: (i)(A) A site that has been identified by the local jurisdiction which permits density and residential floor area ratio at no less than 50 percent of the standards specified under subdivision (a) of Section 65912.157.(ii)(I)(B) (i) A site in a transit-oriented development zone in which at least 33 percent of sites in the relevant transit-oriented development zone have permitted density and residential floor area ratio no less than 50 percent of the standards specified under subdivision (a) of Section 65912.157 and which includes sites with densities that cumulatively allow for at least 75 percent of the aggregate density for the transit-oriented development zone specified under subdivision (a) of Section 65912.157.(II)(ii) A site in a transit-oriented development zone around a transit-oriented development stop that is primarily comprised of a low-resource area which includes sites with densities that cumulatively allow for at least 40 percent of the aggregate density for the transit-oriented development zone specified under subdivision (a) of Section 65912.157.(III)(iii) A site in an area designated as low resource on the most recently adopted version of the opportunity area maps published by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the department, and within a jurisdiction that cumulatively allows for at least 50 percent of the total capacity for units and floor area as specified under Section 65912.157 across all transit-oriented development zones.(iii)(C) A site that is covered by a local transit-oriented development alternative plan adopted by a local government.(iv)(D) Sites within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178, or within the state responsibility area, as defined in Section 4102 of the Public Resources Code.(v)(E) Sites that are vulnerable to one foot of sea level rise, as determined by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the Ocean Protection Council, the United States Geological Survey, the University of California, or a local government’s coastal hazards vulnerability assessment.(F) Any of the following designated before January 1, 2025:(i) A site with a historic resource on a local register.(ii) A contributing site within a historic district included on the State Historic Resources Inventory, as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code.(iii) A parcel individually listed as a historical resource included in the State Historic Resources Inventory, as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code.(2) A local government that has adopted an ordinance pursuant to this subdivision shall indicate on its public zoning map which sites or transit-oriented development zones are and are not covered by Section 65912.157.(c) For the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element, a local government may include a local transit-oriented development alternative plan in any of the following ways:(1) (A) Include a local transit-oriented alternative plan in its housing element. When a local government includes a transit-oriented development alternative plan in its housing element the plan shall include an analysis of how the plan maintains at least an equal feasible developable housing capacity as the baseline established by this chapter.(B) If a local government adopts a housing element that the department has determined to be compliant with this section, then any action to enforce or implement a compliant housing element shall be subject to applicable provisions of housing element law (Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3).(C) The initial submission of a transit-oriented development alternative plan shall be included in the local government’s first draft submittal referenced in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 65585.(D) Sites identified in a local transit-oriented development alternative plan may be included in the inventory of land suitable for residential development, pursuant to the additional requirements of Section 65583.(2) If a local government does not include the local transit-oriented alternative plan in its housing element, the local government may adopt an alternative plan that has been deemed compliant by the department pursuant to Section 65912.160.(d) Section 65912.157 shall not apply within a jurisdiction that has a local transit-oriented alternative plan that has been approved by the department as satisfying the requirements of this section in effect. The department’s approval pursuant to this section shall be valid through the jurisdiction’s next amendment to the housing element of its general plan.(e) A local transit-oriented development alternative plan may consist of an existing local transit-oriented zoning ordinance, overlay zone, specific plan, zoning incentive ordinance or existing program, provided that it meets the requirements of this section.